ottoman_noun.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +N +Pl +P1S +P2S +P3S +P1P +P2P +P3P

LEXICON Root
Noun ;

LEXICON Noun

بابا   NPluralSingular;
كدي  NPluralSingular;
ماصه   NPluralSingular;
چانطه  NPluralSingular;
كتاب  NPluralSingular;


LEXICON NPluralSingular

+N:0   NPossesive;
+N+Pl:^لر  NPossesive;


LEXICON NPossesive

#;
+P1S:^م NCase; !(I)m
+P2S:^ڭ NCase; !(I)n
+P3S:^ى NCase;  !(s)I
+P1P:^مز NCase; !(I)mIz
+P2P:^ڭز NCase; !(I)nIz
+P3P:^لرى NCase; !lArI

LEXICON NCase
#;
+Acc:^ى #;  !(y)I
+Dat:^ه #;  !(y)A
+Abl:^دن #;   !DAn
+Loc:^ده #;   !DA
+Gen:^ڭ #;   !(n)In
+Inst:^له #;  !(y)lA
